Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-651.02
Districts; payments in lieu of taxes; distribution; use.

The officer receiving payment under section 70-651.01 shall distribute to the state and to each governmental subdivision of the state entitled thereto a part of such payment equivalent to that part of the payment which it received in 1957 in lieu of taxes for property located within its boundaries. The payment may be used for such purposes as the governing body of the state or governmental subdivision prescribes.

Laws 1959, c. 317, § 2, p. 1163.